Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202666-739
Motor Fuel Tax Enforcement and Collection Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

There is hereby created the Motor Fuel Tax Enforcement and Collection Cash Fund. Such fund shall consist of appropriations to the fund and money transferred to it pursuant to sections 39-2215 and 66-489. The fund shall be used exclusively for the costs of the Department of Revenue in carrying out its duties under the Compressed Fuel Tax Act, the Petroleum Release Remedial Action Act, the State Aeronautics Act, and sections 66-482 to 66-4,149, 66-501 to 66-531, and 66-712 to 66-736 and other related costs for the Department of Agriculture and the Nebraska State Patrol, except that transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Motor Fuel Tax Enforcement and Collection Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1991, LB 627, § 142;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 53;

Laws 1994, LB 1160, § 110;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 40;

Laws 2019, LB512, § 8;

Laws 2026, LB815, § 3.
October 1, 2026
Compressed Fuel Tax Act, see section 66-697.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.

Petroleum Release Remedial Action Act, see section 66-1501.

State Aeronautics Act, see section 3-154.